test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_O_bagwaaniigin_gt-norm.yaml
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gibagwaaniiginomishinaanidig, gibagwaaniiginomishinaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gibagwaaniiginomishinaanidig, gibagwaaniiginomishinaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gibagwaaniiginomishiwaabaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gibagwaaniiginomishiwaabaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomishiwaabaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gibagwaaniiginomishiwaadig, gibagwaaniiginomishiwaadog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gibagwaaniiginomishiwaadig, gibagwaaniiginomishiwaadog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gibagwaaniiginomishiwaadig, gibagwaaniiginomishiwaadog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: obagwaaniiginomishiniibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: obagwaaniiginomishiniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: obagwaaniiginomishiniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [obagwaaniiginomishiniidig, obagwaaniiginomishiniidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [obagwaaniiginomishiniidig, obagwaaniiginomishiniidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [obagwaaniiginomishiniidig, obagwaaniiginomishiniidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: obagwaaniiginomishiwaabaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: obagwaaniiginomishiwaabaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: obagwaaniiginomishiwaabaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [obagwaaniiginomishiwaadig, obagwaaniiginomishiwaadog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [obagwaaniiginomishiwaadig, obagwaaniiginomishiwaadog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [obagwaaniiginomishiwaadig, obagwaaniiginomishiwaadog]
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanidig, nibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanidog]
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanidig, nibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanidog]
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanidig, nibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanidog]
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanidig, nibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanidog]
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanidig, nibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanidog]
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanidig, nibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanidig, gibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanidig, gibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanidig, gibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaabaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaabaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaabaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gibagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaadig, gibagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaadog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gibagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaadig, gibagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaadog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gibagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaadig, gibagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaadog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanidig, gibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanidig, gibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanidig, gibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaabaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaabaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaabaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gibagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaadig, gibagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaadog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gibagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaadig, gibagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaadog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gibagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaadig, gibagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaadog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiniibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [obagwaaniiginoonyimishiniidig, obagwaaniiginoonyimishiniidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [obagwaaniiginoonyimishiniidig, obagwaaniiginoonyimishiniidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [obagwaaniiginoonyimishiniidig, obagwaaniiginoonyimishiniidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaabaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaabaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaabaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [obagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaadig, obagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaadog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [obagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaadig, obagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaadog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [obagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaadig, obagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaadog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiniibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [obagwaaniiginoonsimishiniidig, obagwaaniiginoonsimishiniidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [obagwaaniiginoonsimishiniidig, obagwaaniiginoonsimishiniidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [obagwaaniiginoonsimishiniidig, obagwaaniiginoonsimishiniidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaabaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaabaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaabaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [obagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaadig, obagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaadog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [obagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaadig, obagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaadog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [obagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaadig, obagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaadog]
     
